Maryland, session 2025, SB0179.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
13–903.
(a) The following vehicles are exempt from the registration fees specified in this
subtitle:
(8) A vehicle owned by, or leased to, and personally used by a veteran who:
(i) As designated or classified by the U.S. Department of Veterans
Affairs, has lost the use of a hand, arm, or leg, or is totally disabled; or
(ii) Has a permanent impairment of both eyes so that:
1. The central visual acuity is 20/200 or less in the better eye,
with corrective glasses; or
2. There is a field defect in which the peripheral field has
contracted to such an extent that the widest diameter of visual field subtends an angular
distance no greater than 20 degrees in the better eye;
(9) A vehicle owned and personally used by an individual who is the
surviving spouse of a deceased disabled veteran, as defined under § 7–208 of the
Tax – Property Article; [and]
(10) A Type I or Type II school vehicle owned and operated by a religious
organization; AND
(11) NOT MORE THAN ONE VEHICLE OWNED BY, OR LEASED TO, AND
PERSONALLY USED BY A VETERAN WHO IS UNEMPLOYABLE DUE TO A
SERVICE–CONNECTED DISABILITY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.